Language: <F P=105> Persian </F>
Article Type:CSO 

  [3 Nov pp 5, 6] 
  [Text] Legislative and Parliamentary Affairs Division. The 
first part of the Majles inquiry and investigation report on the 
activities of the Voice and Vision was read as follows in the 
Majles session yesterday, to which we call your attention. 
<H5>  Examination of the Programs of the First and Second Network </H5>
<H5>  Preface </H5>
  The Imam, may God's paradise be his, called the Voice and 
Vision the "great Islamic university" and in this way outlined 
its general direction and main mission. The Voice and Vision 
must be judged from this perspective and with emphasis on this 
principle. 
  The audience of the Voice and Vision, according to the 
explicit statement of the Imam, consists of the masses of the 
people. Hence, the Voice and Vision must in the general course 
of its cultural and Islamic movement always keep its audience in 
mind. 
  The Voice and Vision organization, especially the Vision, 
must use artistic and effective methods, such as films, serials, 
and recreational and attractive programs, in the best possible 
manner to convey its message and not be satisfied with the 
simple, primitive, low-budget conveyance of messages, such as 
speeches and direct statement of the message. One of the bases 
for judgment is to see to what extent this important medium has 
made use of effective and attractive methods to transmit its 
message. 
  The programs of the Vision can be produced in three 
ways--negative, neutral, and indifferent programming--in 
addition to programs in support of Islam and the revolution. For 
example, if the intention is to emphasize health care, this 
message can be conveyed by showing a European family and clean 
and beautiful churches or the message can be conveyed by showing 
a Muslim family with clean and beautiful Islamic mosques and in 
this way examine the constructive directions of the program. 
  The issues that will be discussed in this report shall 
consist of: 
  1) Examination of films and serials broadcast from 1353 [21 
March 1974-20 March 1975] to 1371 [21 March 1992-20 March 1993]. 
  2) Examination of the Network 1 programs of the Vision in 
1363 [21 March 1984-20 March 1985] and 1370 [21 March 1991-20 
March 1992] and a comparison between them. 
  3) Examination of the Network 2 programs in 1363 and 1370 
and 
a comparison between them. 
  4) Comparison of all the programs of Networks 1 and 2 during 
these two time periods. 
<H5>  A. Examination of Films and Serials </H5>
  From 1363 to 1371, films and serials were broadcast about 
900 
times from Networks 1 and 2, of which about 700 were foreign 
films and serials produced with high-technical expertise, which 
are consequently very attractive and influential. In other 
words, a Muslim Iranian youth in the past eight years, during 
the most sensitive period of the formation of his personality, 
has been influenced by such serials, which, although they 
propagate some humane and material values, in a very subtle 
manner bring divine spiritual values under question. For 
example, in the movie "Billy Bud," the protagonist is a 
beautiful and innocent young man with certain good attributes 
portrayed, but the film explicitly states that he is a bastard, 
and while overlooking the ugliness of an illegitimate act it 
shows that the result of this heinous act is that he is a hero 
with high human qualities. There are also films that show 
educational environments, which are less harmful than other 
foreign films, but by showing coeducational schools and very 
normal emotional relationships between boys and girls in these 
schools, Iranian precollegiate male and female students who have 
been prohibited from having relations with the opposite sex 
begin to contemplate. By showing such films frequently and 
constantly, the pleasure of relationships with the opposite sex 
in a very good and progressive environment is shown to the 
student, who becomes intrigued and subsequently takes a position 
against Islam, which prohibits him from such a relationship, and 
becomes inclined towards the Western culture. He or she becomes 
disinterested in veiling; the Islamic regime becomes condemned 
in his or her mind; and his or her personality is formed in a 
manner that prepares the grounds for rejecting divine Islamic 
values and accepting decadent Western values. It was expected 
that the Voice and Vision in the course of these eight years 
would gradually increase domestic production and reduce foreign 
films and serials and even export its products abroad. But, on 
the contrary, we have been witnessing an increase in such films 
and serials in recent years. For example, from 50 foreign films 
and serials in 1368 [21 March 1989-20 March 1990] we have 
reached 120 in 1371 [21 March 1992-20 March 1993]. In 1368, 41 
percent of the films and serials broadcast were Iranian, but in 
the first six months of 1371, the number was reduced to 25 
percent, and foreign serials and films have reached from 59 
percent to 75 percent. In other words, while the Voice and 
Vision is more than 14 years old, our young people benefit 75 
percent from foreign culture and 25 percent from our own 
culture. And this is provided the 25-percent domestic production 
is not under the blade of quality control. For example, the 
serial "Busy District" ridicules the revolution and the regime, 
or a serial called "Crocodile Tears" is produced at incredible 
cost, and because of certain problems of deviation, many parts 
of it are cut out, but even the parts that are shown are the 
target of widespread protest by the people because of problems 
of deviations. 
  The serials are made at high cost but have such internal 
problems that after production they are announced as unfit for 
broadcast. An example is "Ziba Beauty Salon." Some films are 
broadcast once, but because they insult Islam they are objected 
to and are deemed unfit for broadcast, such as "Haji Washington" 
and "The Death of Yazdgerd." Other examples exist which show 
that even the 25-percent domestic production that should 
eliminate the effect of the 75-percentage of foreign products 
are in some way in line with the 75-percent foreign productions. 
Of course, of the 25-percent domestic production, only 8 percent 
is produced by the Voice and Vision; the remainder is purchased 
from outside the organization. 
  A typical Iranian girl in the course of eight years has been 
affected by hundreds of models of unveiling and improper 
veiling, which have settled in her mind as positive values. 
(Foreign serials propagate unveiling and domestic serials 
improper veiling.) But, unfortunately, the high standard of 
veiled women has not been observed in films and serials in order 
for them to become interested in veiling. 
  In the serial "Hezardastan," which is considered a 
television 
masterpiece and was made at high cost, during the sensitive 
period in late Qajar rule, the deviation of the constitutional 
revolution and the government of Reza Khan to the end of the 
World War is shown. In it not only is there no sign of the 
spiritual leaders of the Muslim nation, such as Modarres and 
Sheykh Fazlollah Nuri, but also the assassin of martyr Sheykh 
Fazlollah Nuri is presented as a brave, free, sensitive, 
innocent, justice seeking, antiforeign, mystic, and patriotic 
person through cinematic tricks, whereas Khoshrevis should have 
been presented as a person hated by Islamic society. In the 
program, "The Seventh Art," where there is a discussion about 
the cinema of the former Soviet Union, the host of the program 
who is a well-known Westernized individual and has attacked 
Islam in the university environment and fought the religious 
forces, mentions the reason for the disintegration of the Soviet 
government to be regulating the activities of the artists and 
restricting their freedom, thereby implying that the artist must 
be free to create whatever he wishes and in this way tries to 
make the artists turn away from serving Islam and the revolution. 
  The same perspective has resulted in showing a naked woman 
in 
his film in a classroom. He has been teaching our students for 
years and now has been discovered by television. He has been 
invited to transmit his ideas to the whole society. 
<H5>  B. Examination of the Programs of the First Network </H5>
  An examination of television Network 1 programs during the 
one week of 25/12/1363 to 02/01/1364 [16-22 March 1985] show 
that 45 percent of all the programs were related to Islam and 
the revolution and 55 percent were indifferent to Islam and the 
revolution or were deviant. Among the programs related to Islam 
and the revolution, 55 percent were indifferent to Islam and the 
revolution or were deviant. Among the programs related to Islam 
and the revolution, 95 percent were in the form of direct 
messages, that is, speeches, news, call for prayers, and 
recitation of the Koran and 5 percent in the form of 
documentaries and reports, and no programming in the form of 
films and serials. Among the indifferent or deviant programs in 
relation to the revolution, 1 percent were in the form of direct 
messages, 28 percent in studio and report forms, and 68 percent 
in the form of films and serials. In other words, 99 percent of 
the neutral and negative messages were presented in very 
artistic, cinematic, and studio methods, while not even one case 
of Islamic revolutionary messages was presented through 
cinematic methods. Among the serials and films unrelated to 
Islam and the revolution, 64 percent were foreign and 36 percent 
domestic. Unfortunately, even in the 36 percent domestic 
production, no supervision was implemented to see that they be 
in defense of Islam and the revolution. 
  An examination of the seven years after the initial study, 
that is, during the week of 26/01/1370 to 01/02/1370 [15-21 Apr 
1991], shows that 42 percent [of the programming] was related to 
Islam and the revolution and 58 percent was indifferent to or a 
deviation from Islam and the revolution. In other words, in 
quantity, a decrease of 3 percent in programs related to Islam 
and the revolution was revealed. 
  Of course, among the programs related to Islam and the 
revolution, 20 percent were studio productions and reports and 
13 percent films and serials, which indicates a relative 
improvement compared to the previous seven years. After seven 
years, neutral programs and those that deviate from Islam and 
the revolution have progressed in quantity and quality, which is 
very worrisome. 
  On the one hand, in 1363 [21 March 1984-20 March 1985], 
Iranian films and serials comprised 14 percent of the total 
programs, whereas in 1370 [21 March 1991-20 March 1992], they 
decreased to 11.5 percent. On the other hand, foreign films and 
serials, which in 1363 comprised 24 percent of all the programs, 
increased to 38 percent in 1370. Apparently the Voice and Vision 
is gradually losing Islamic and revolutionary incentives and has 
become indifferent and neutral. 
<H5>  C. Examination of Network 2 Programming </H5>
  An examination of Network 2 programming for the week of 
25/12/1363 to 02/01/1364 [16-22 March 1985] shows that this 
network has similar percentages to those of Network 1. The 
programs related to Islam and the revolution are produced 98 
percent as direct messages, that is, at low-cost and 
ineffectively, whereas programs indifferent, neutral, and even 
deviant to Islam are higher in quantity, attractiveness, and 
effectiveness. In an examination of one week seven years later, 
that is, the week of 07/09/1371 to 14/09/1371 [28 Nov-5 Dec 
1992], we witness a decrease in programs related to Islam and 
the revolution, that is, we reach from 46 percent to 29 percent, 
while neutral and deviant programs increase from 54 percent to 
71 percent. In other words, after seven years, the share of 
Islam and the revolution in Network 2 decreases by 17 percent. 
Of the total serials unrelated to Islam, 79 percent were foreign 
and 21 percent domestic. In other words, the budget and 
resources of the televisions were spent on neutral programs and 
despite the storming cultural invasion of the enemy, television 
does not have the power to produce films and serials in defense 
of Islam. 
  Network 2 translated into Persian produced and broadcast in 
the form of television serials four plays in 1371, although the 
actors and the atmosphere of the plays were 100 percent similar 
to the foreign products; in fact, one would think they had been 
imported. At the same time, 79 percent of films and serials are 
foreign, and Network 2, instead of making films and serials in 
defense of Islam and the revolution, has acted to increase the 
number of foreign programs. 
  If we compare all the programs of Networks 1 and 2 on the 
basis of the samples in the early 1360's [1980's] and the early 
1370's [1990's], Network 1 had an increase from 45 hours of 
weekly programs to 48 hours, and Network 2 also increased from 
41 hours to 44 hours. In other words, both networks added three 
hours to their weekly programs. The share of Islamic and 
revolutionary programs decreased from 39.5 hours in 1363 to 33.5 
hours in 1370. On the other hand, indifferent or deviant weekly 
programs increased from 50 hours in 1363 to 58 hours in 1370. 
<H5>  D. Children's Programs of Television Network 1 </H5>
  Undoubtedly, among television programs, those designed for 
children are especially important, because [television] is a 
very attractive school in front of which our children sit from 
the age of five to their youth for several hours a day, even on 
Fridays. Since children's programs are all in the form of films, 
serials, cartoons, songs, and happy programs accompanied by 
music, they have a large number of viewers and are very 
attractive. In other words, the children of the revolution who 
have now reached the age of 14 have been under the influence of 
children's television programs more than any other educational 
factor. Therefore, its examination is very vital and important, 
because television can train young, faithful, determined people 
with moral virtues who are eager to learn and serve Islam and 
the people or on the contrary immoral young people who support 
the West, do not believe in Islam, and are alien to the 
revolution. 
  With this brief preface, we shall now examine the children's 
programs of Network 1. 
  Network 1, during the week of 25/12/1363 to 02/01/1364, 
broadcast a total of 15 hours of programs for children. In other 
words, on the average, two hours per day, of which 5 percent was 
direct messages, 23 percent studio productions and reports, and 
72 percent in the form of films, serials, and cartoons, which 
are the most effective and attractive kinds of television 
programs. 
  Of the total number of films and serials, 90 percent were 
foreign and 10 percent domestic productions. In other words, one 
hour of foreign cartoons were shown per day. Experts agree that 
cartoons and animations are the most attractive of programs and 
form the personality of children. Western companies transmit 
Western culture through these cartoons, which, because of the 
emotional relationship between the heroes and the children, have 
a profound educational effect. A child who was born in 1357 [21 
March 1978-20 March 1979] and was not affected by the negative 
influences of the society prior to the revolution, up to 1372 
[21 March 1993-20 March 1994], that is, in 15 years, has watched 
about 5,000 hours of foreign films and cartoons. In other words, 
he has been under the control of the Western and Eastern 
cultures, which he has watched and accepted eagerly. If we do 
not believe in the intentions of the West and the oppressors 
regarding propaganda and conspiracies in this way, we must admit 
that at least in all of these programs the culture and customs 
of the producer have been propagated and there has been no sign 
of Islam and divine values. Wine drinking, unveiling, and 
relations between boys and girls exist and are propagated in 
these cartoons to the extent that children accept them as normal. 
  Marco Polo, the European spy to the Mongol court, has been 
shown frequently as the best and most beautiful model and 
manifestation of all human virtues and emotions in the form of 
films and cartoons on television. In them, the Orient and the 
Islamic countries are shown to be barbarian and full of 
injustice, bloodshed, and backwardness, thereby presenting the 
West as the place of higher human beings and the superior race, 
which inculcates in the minds of children that the savior must 
come from the West. 
  In the attractive animation "Around the World in 80 Days," 
the main hero, who is a valuable, powerful, brave, alert, and 
ever-victorious character, enchants the children with his human 
characteristics and attributes and is explicitly introduced as 
an Englishman whose journey ends in London. If we see that our 
youths who were born after the victory of the revolution are 
inclined towards Western culture, it is because in the course of 
their lives, one hour per day, they have been shown the very 
attractive material and spiritual qualities in connection with 
the Western world in a most effective manner. And now, if the 
Islamic Republic wants to take away from them all that beauty, 
which has penetrated the depths of their being, through speeches 
and threats of judicial power, they will not only resist it and 
refuse to give up what they love, but a grudge will be created 
in their hearts towards the Islamic Republic, and subsequently 
they will not be made to understand with a few analytical 
discussions that the West threatens humanity and we must resist 
its cultural invasion. 
  The children's programs of Network 1 in the course of a week 
were 65 percent films, cartoons, and serials, but 8 percent are 
domestic puppet shows and 23 percent of studio programs, most of 
which, unfortunately, are indifferent towards Islam and the 
revolution and are in some sense international. Seven years 
after this date, from 26/01/1370 to 01/02/1370 [15-21 Apr 1991], 
80 percent of all programs were foreign films, serials, and 
cartoons. In other words, during this period, foreign programs 
were more than four times the number of domestic programs. In 
the course of this week, 98 percent of the foreign or domestic 
programs were indifferent to Islam and the revolution and only 2 
percent were in support of Islam and the revolution. 
<H5>  Examination of Children's Programs of Network 2 </H5>
  From 01/03/1362 to 31/03/1362 [22 May-21 June], 55 percent 
were domestic productions and 45 percent foreign productions. Of 
the total, 80 percent were indifferent to Islam and the 
revolution and 20 percent related to Islam and the revolution. 
Among the indifferent programs, 40 percent were effective and 
influential programs, but none of the Islamic programs were 
films, serials, and cartoons. In an examination eight years 
later, that is, 06/09/1371 to 03/10/1371 [27 November-24 
December 1992], a total of 66 percent were domestic productions 
and 34 percent foreign productions. The 11-percent increase in 
domestic production is cause for happiness. But, unfortunately, 
the increase in domestic production has not been at the service 
of Islam and the revolution, and of the 66-percent domestic 
productions, only 16 percent had Islamic and revolutionary 
messages and 84 percent were indifferent or deviant. In other 
words, compared to 10 years ago, the volume of programs related 
to Islam and the revolution decreased from 20 percent to 16 
percent; and this is due to the lack of faithful and committed 
forces in this very important medium. In fact, the main reason 
for the retrogression of the Voice and Vision and the main 
problem is the abandonment of committed forces. This trend has 
continued unceasingly in the past 10 years. 
<H5>  Report on Manpower </H5>
  In a summary of the report on manpower, the following will 
be 
examined: 
  A) The quantitative and qualitative presence of the cadre 
prior to the revolution and lack of essential change in the body 
of the Voice and Vision. The Voice and Vision is a center that 
has about 14,000 personnel, most of whom are left from the 
previous regime. Despite the fact that it has been purged, like 
other organizations, the composition of a large section of the 
organization has not essentially changed. Even the absorption of 
Hezbollah elements, due to the governing climate, has not been 
able to create fundamental change and the Hezbollah elements 
have either become dependent on the climate and transformed or 
remained silent. 
  Of course, the issue of manpower must be examined on two 
arenas, the managers and the body of the organization, 
especially in regards to artists and those engaged in audio and 
visual production. 
  In the management group, appropriate changes have been made, 
but sometimes we see inappropriate operations by some of these 
managers who have been affected by the existing climate in the 
organization. 
  Among the artists and those involved in producing audio and 
visual programs essential changes have not taken place and the 
old elements, due to intellectual opposition to the Islamic 
regime and revolution, protect the interests of their fellow 
guild members. To understand this point, several examples are 
necessary. 
  One of the known figures in the past was the host of the 
"Radio Darya" program, who had relations with SAVAK and was once 
was dismissed from Friday morning on the radio because of his 
bad temper, but was called back to work again. 
  Two of the hosts of the Voice and Vision, despite their 
justified figures on the surface, misused their situation to 
receive resources from organizations and after revelation in a 
film in which their immoral problems were shown, they were 
dismissed, but unfortunately, they were rehired by the Vision. 
  There are numerous examples of the involvement of 
questionable and anticulture programming in the Vision and 
serials. In the serial "Azarestan," an actor that was in 
offensive films of the Tyrant's time is used. He is the actor in 
the film "Mohallel," which was made with the goal of ridiculing 
Islamic values. At the present time, he is the expert and judge 
for the Center for the Performing Arts of the Ministry of 
Islamic Culture and Guidance. Other figures who are prohibited 
from acting in films by the Ministry of Islamic Culture and 
Guidance but are hired by the Voice and Vision and used in many 
serials are included in "Gol-e Pamchal," which, unfortunately, 
is produced by the Shahed group. One of them, while acting in 
this serial, was arrested by the Antinarcotics Prosecutor's 
Office for possession of opium and later released. 
  Another example is honoring the experienced actor of the 
Tyrant's time and a deputy to the monarchical Parliament, which 
occurred on 21/04/1370 [12 July 1991] in the "Journal of Art" 
programs of "Vision Week," despite the fact that he has had no 
positive artistic activity during the revolution. It can be 
argued that to honor him is to honor the art and programs of the 
Tyrant's time. 
  Another example is the official invitation to the showman of 
the Tyrant's time by Mr. Va'ezi, the director of the Voice. The 
invitation stated: "Your place is empty among the artists." Of 
course, later the action of Mr. Va'ezi was protested by the head 
of the organization, and the above-mentioned actor was dismissed. 
  The mischievous acts in the Voice and Vision that we witness 
now and then are directly related to the presence and power of 
the antirevolutionary elements and the remnants of the Tyrant's 
time. These mischievous acts are sometimes overtly against the 
revolution and Islam and sometimes subtly follow objectives that 
are hidden from the eyes of many people, some of which are as 
follows: 
  1) On 12 Farvardin [1 April], Islamic Republic Day of 1365 
[21 March 1986], a film was shown with a scene in which was the 
following dialogue: "Anyone who says yes has betrayed himself 
and his family." After investigations, it was discovered that 
the dubber had done it on purpose and it was not in the original 
text. The wife and two of the children of the dubber were among 
the organizational hypocrites, and one of his sons was 
eliminated. 
  2) Reading of a poem with an antirevolutionary content by 
the 
woman host for residents abroad. 
  3) The antireligious film "Like the Wind," for which the 
producer had received 700,000 tomans for its broadcast and was 
supposed to be shown on 29/05/1370 [20 August 1991], which was 
prevented from being shown. 
  4) Suppression and mocking of the Muslim and Hezbollah 
forces 
in the weekly "Journal of Art" program, for example, in the 
program in Mordad 1370 [23 July-22 August 1991], involving two 
good, positive films, "Fifty-Three Persons" and "Chasing 
Shadows," produced by Messrs. Yusef Seyyed-Mahdavi and 'Ali 
Shah-Hatami, efforts were made to suggest that both films were 
weak and the directors incapable and in which the martyr in the 
films was referred to as the one killed. This program was trying 
to describe and praise artistic antirevolutionary figures. 
  5) The television program "In Love With the Sun," which was 
broadcast on 07/02/1370 [27 April 1991] before the national 
news, featured the speech of a Sunni cleric who was in prison 
for having relations with foreign countries, conspiracy of 
membership in the World Sunni organization for Armed Struggle, 
and having a hand in the riots in Bandar Langeh, which resulted 
in the killing of 58 people. The broadcast of his speech 
coincided with his release and presence in the region. 
  After being informed of the incident, the grand leader, 
addressing the head of the Voice and Vision organization, said: 
"This is a grave damage. The reasons for such incidents, which 
occur every once in a while, must be carefully examined. 
Undoubtedly, the Ministry of Information must be present 
somewhere on the line of production and broadcast. Make an 
investigation of this issue." 
  Of course, despite the explicit statement of the grand 
leader, no steps were taken by the Voice and Vision to ensure 
the presence of the Ministry of Information. 
  6) The refusal of the newscaster of the day to read the news 
of the passing of the Imam and the issued announcements. Mr. 
Hayati, another newscaster, read the news appropriately, and due 
to his obvious emotional state while reading the text, he was 
ridiculed by his colleagues. 
  7) Last year in one of the children's programs the host of 
the program read a so-called educational text and mentioned two 
persons called Mas'ud and Maryam and their resistance to 
hardship, praising them and saying that, ultimately, they were 
victorious. Given the central slogan of the hypocrites, "Mas'ud 
and Maryam," the content is suspicious. 
  8) Showing of movies during inappropriate days, which was 
apparently intended to provoke society, such as simultaneous 
with the workers' strike in the Kangan Natural Gas Complex; the 
rerun of the film "Mine Workers' Strike," or from 10-25 Mehr 
[2-17 October] last year, simultaneous with the annoying 
propaganda and operations of the hypocrites, on Tuesday night, 
14/07/1371 [6 October 1992], a film about the struggles of 
revolutionary elements against the government was shown, which 
was advertised the previous nights. 
  9) Insulting the revered position of the Prophet in the 
program "Friday Morning With You," in Mehr 1371 [23 Sepember-22 
October 1992], which was broadcast as a joke from the 
loudspeaker of the Islamic regime. The first person says, I have 
heard you have claimed to be a prophet. The second one says, 
Yes. The first one says, Where is your book? The second one 
says, I do not have a book, I will have them take notes. 
  10) In one of the radio programs, an interview was conducted 
with Dr. Hesabi, the well-known Iranian physicist. Without any 
connection with the subject matter, the interviewer asked a 
question about the origin of life from the late professor, which 
cleverly negates the origin of life and the existence of God. He 
tells the late professor that he might not wish to answer that 
question, at the same time creating doubt in regards to God and 
playing with the beliefs of the listeners. Of course, the late 
Dr. Hesabi gave a biting answer based on reasoning in proving 
the existence of God and the system of the creation and 
neutralized the mischievous question of the host. 
  [11] Use of one of the actors in the serial "A Lesson to 
Learn," who was one of the actors with a bad record during the 
time of the Tyrant. The use of an actress in the same serial who 
worked in a third-rate cabaret during the time of the Tyrant, 
which unfortunately has even played the role of a companion to 
some of the infallible ones in some serials. 
  12) In 1371 [21 March 1992-20 March 1993], in a program of 
several parts on "Examining Contemporary History," which was 
broadcast from Network 2, an individual is used as a writer and 
host whose name appears in the titles and who is one of the 
active cultural elements of the Tyrant and a leader of the 
cultural opposition, who cooperates with enemy publications and 
foreign information networks, such as the BBC, and recently in a 
video interview has accused the regime of the Islamic Republic 
and the Imam of killing a number of writers of the press in the 
Islamic Republic. 
<H5>  B. Programs Outside the Cultural Policies </H5>
  The mass media plays a major role in strengthening national 
unity in every country. Especially in our country, in which 
various ethnic groups exist, the Voice and Vision is expected to 
help strengthen national unity under the present sensitive 
conditions. But, unfortunately, in the programs of the Voice and 
Vision, we see programs that are contrary to the overall 
cultural policies of the country, which by ridiculing the 
accents of various ethnic groups create problems. In most 
"Friday Morning With You" programs, the accent of Turkish 
speakers is frequently ridiculed. If attention is paid to the 
sensitivity of the Azari accent in this juncture, especially in 
the Republic of Azerbaijan, where people are sensitive, the 
negative aspect of the issue becomes apparent, or ridiculing the 
Esfahan, Rasht, and Lori accents. The latter, considering the 
report by the Central Office of Information of Lorestan, has 
caused sensitivity. This program is put together mostly by 
people who have problems. 
  There are also many programs in the foreign serials that can 
be eliminated with changes in the dialogues. For example, in the 
serial "The Secret Army," which was an attractive serial, in the 
last section, the character of the antidomination and 
antiforeign strugglers was questioned somehow and, on the other 
hand, the character of a criminal element in Nazi Germany was 
embellished. The leader of the rescue line trades all of his 
self-sacrifice for money and ownership of a restaurant... 
[sentence as published] 
  Or in the serial "The Mountain Fighters," which is the story 
of a group who have suffered injustice at the hands of the cruel 
government and was appropriate to the antioppression policy of 
the Islamic Republic of Iran, the main subject of the film is 
trivialized as a result of the violence, killings, and murder 
and the excitement of the fighting, which had negative 
educational effects. Incidentally, the negative educational 
effects caused problems for the Islamic Republic, and in the 
riots of Arak in 1371 [21 March 1992-20 March 1993] a large 
number of unmotivated young people who had destroyed many 
government buildings and their equipment said in interrogations 
that they were influenced by the serial "The Mountain Fighters" 
and had enjoyed doing what they did. 
  A basic criticism of the pictorial programs of the Voice and 
Vision is lack of attention to full veiling of women, lack of 
attention to the chador, and spreading the culture of the 
"manteau" and scarves of the immoral kind. If statistics of the 
serials of the Voice and Vision are prepared, it can be said 
practically no programs are devoted to veiled women with 
chadors. And if there are women with chadors, they lack 
authentic identity and positive, intelligent character. The 
women with chadors in the films and serials are portrayed 
negatively as nosey snitches, impolite and illiterate. In any 
case, such examples, whether intentional or unintentional, 
oppose the philosophy of the chador and promote improper 
veiling, the effects of which we see in the society. On the 
whole, it can be said that despite the cultural policies devised 
by the policy making institutions, in the Voice and Vision, in 
terms of reforming the society, in practice programs are 
injected into the society by the antennas of that organization 
that can be said to be serving cultural invasion in some way. In 
addition to the issue of veiling, the broadcast of popular music 
from the Voice and Vision also has caused protests by religious 
individuals and Friday imams in the Friday prayer sermons and 
has caused the elimination of the ugliness of songs by the 
Tyrant's singers [sentence as published]. 
  Films and serials that deal with the war or revolution 
usually have problems and regarding the forming of the Islamic 
revolution, the effective and main elements are either ignored 
or trivialized. On the other hand, efforts are made to show the 
influence of the intellectual elements as important and strong. 
For example, the serial "Ra'na" can be mentioned, in which the 
perspective of the filmmaker is contrary to the reasons, roots, 
determining elements, leadership, and other authentic authors of 
the Islamic revolution and in which attention is paid to the 
intellectual relations in the creation and victory of the 
revolution. Even in the titles of the films special emphasis is 
placed on the hammer and sickle of a worker, which emphasizes 
the serial appearing to be leftist. Or in regards to the imposed 
war, the viewpoint of the filmmaker generally concerns the 
examination of the social effects and second, the problems of 
the war in the society and mostly dwells on the ugliness and 
violence and in some way questions the self-sacrifice of the 
combatants, instead of showing the war from the perspective of 
the conspiracy of the oppressors against the revolution and 
engaging in the philosophy of the sacred defense and showing the 
lofty spirituality of the combatants, showing their problems. An 
example is the serial "Gol-e Pamchal" or the film "Bashu, the 
Little Stranger." Some of these films, because by nature of 
their being contrary to the philosophy and goals of the war, 
were not even allowed to be shown during the war but were shown 
after the war. 
<H5>  Management in the Voice and Vision </H5>
  Despite the fact that the managers and cultural officials of 
the Voice and Vision are among the well-known cultural figures 
in the country and on the lower levels as well the committed and 
concerned managers, especially in the various groups of Networks 
1 and 2, are the majority, the question arises as to why the 
criticisms and protests regarding the programs of the Voice and 
Vision are increasing. 
  This question can be answered in two ways. First, the 
vastness and variety in the Voice and Vision and the variety of 
audiences require a variety of programs. The phenomenon of the 
video and the necessity to fight it with programs acceptable to 
the people, the border areas, and foreign television and 
satisfying different tastes automatically causes errors. Also, 
different viewpoints and opinions concerning the programs cause 
criticism, which is sometimes proper and correct and sometimes 
illogical. Even during the time of the Imam, such different 
opinions were expressed. The example was the endorsement of 
"Autumn in the Meadow" by the Imam. 
  Second, some of the negative problems in the Voice and 
Vision 
have their roots in the influence of the culture of the Tyrant 
and the alienation of some of the managers who think 
differently. The arena of the Voice and Vision, with its 
artistic composition, has artists that are artistic and cultural 
dependents of the Tyrant, and these individuals in addition to a 
small number of managers who think differently, have prepared 
the grounds for the growth of infiltrating elements affecting 
the decisions of the Voice and Vision. By getting close to the 
directors of cultural groups and justifying their efforts, they 
influence the decisions of the Voice and Vision. These 
individuals, even in order to prevent the spread of the Islamic 
culture, under various pretexts try to sway the Hezbollah 
managers. For example, some time ago, they had convinced 
everyone that Islamic cover, that is, the chador, causes 
technical problems in front of the camera. 
  At the same time, we witness interviews with and the showing 
of faces of problematic figures who are among the most 
influential elements of the cultural opposition, or the 
participation of the editor in chief of the RASTAKHIZ newspaper 
in the seventh "Art Program." 
  The infiltrating elements can divert the produced programs 
from their main identity and direct them towards their own goals 
or cause the reappearance of actors from the time of the Tyrant 
on television. 
  In the outside-the-border unit of the Voice and Vision, 
weakness in management has caused individuals, even from the 
embassies, to operate the outside-the-border unit, some of whom 
have been spies. The manager of one of the centers last year 
made a case against four Hezbollah elements and sent them to the 
Administrative Violation Court. Their crime was the legal 
relationship between several employees with one employee 
[sentence as published]. 
  A person, who as a result of relations with deviant 
individuals, resigned from this institution and then was 
arrested, who had always had conflicts with the Hezbollah 
people, is at present the director of the Voice and Vision of 
one of the provinces. 
  The former director of the center in that province, who had 
had a record of conflict with Hezbollah elements, is now in 
charge of the office of the Voice and Vision in a foreign 
country and according to reports promotes (deviant) ideas and 
criticizes the ideas of Martyr Motahhari. 
  In making serials, much financial misuse takes place, so 
that 
with additional unnecessary scenes the cost of production 
increases greatly. 
  In 1369 [21 March 1990-20 March 1991], property of the Voice 
and Vision was stolen, and after an investigation it became 
clear that even the manager had had a hand in it. The decree 
issued concerning the manager, who was supported by the 
director, was not carried out, but subordinate individuals were 
dismissed, and after a long time, the manager was politely 
dismissed for moral corruption. Assigned to Germany but still in 
Tehran, he received his salary in foreign currency. 
<H5>  Security Situation of the Voice and Vision </H5>
  The Voice and Vision is one of the vital centers of the 
Islamic Republic, which may always be a target in various ways 
of the enemies. Its physical protection is easy, but protection 
of the personnel who are the target of influence by foreigners 
and concerning whom the organization does not have the necessary 
coordination with the Ministry of Information has caused 
numerous problems, such as visits by the leaders of the cultural 
opposition and heads of cultural invasion, employment of 
foreigners, lack of possibility for the Ministry of Information 
to control its subjects due to lack of cooperation by the 
organization while 500 of the employees have security experience 
in that ministry. Some of the individuals in the organization 
have been arrested for spying for foreigners. In short, the 
security of the organization cannot or does not want to 
cooperate with the Ministry of Information, whereas in this 
connection it will itself suffer the detriments and cause 
problems as well. 
<H5>  Conclusion </H5>
  The instances that were mentioned can to some extent show 
the 
role and in a sense the power of the cadres prior to the 
revolution in the Voice and Vision of the Islamic Republic and 
in the same connection, the inability of the system to change 
the composition or correct and purge the ideas and thoughts of 
the program producers of the Voice and Vision is tangible. What 
has occurred in the Voice and Vision after the victory of the 
revolution are changes in high-level management, but the 
specialized affairs in the Voice and Vision and lack of elements 
who can replace the program producers all at once or gradually 
have caused the previous composition to remain as before in the 
organization and after the revolution no change being made in 
the cadre. It is interesting that the affairs and techniques 
that exist in the Voice and Vision, particularly in the artistic 
dimensions, did not attract the attention of the Muslim strata 
prior to the revolution and naturally after the victory of the 
revolution work had to be continued with the existing 
individuals. But the cadre building system of the regime suffers 
from a chronic ailment in this regard so that it has been unable 
to train an artistic, executive, and competent cadre to be able 
to gradually take charge of and monopolize the vital cultural 
and artistic arteries, especially in the Voice and Vision, and 
create a sound climate to govern the society. In the meantime, 
the official cadre building center of the Voice and Vision, the 
College of the Voice and Vision, has unfortunately been unable 
to play its essential role in absorbing and training faithful 
and sincere artistic forces to replace the old forces. Moreover, 
as it was said, due to the specialization of the profession in 
the Voice and Vision and the necessity of expertise and 
technique in audiovisual production, technical weakness can be a 
suitable excuse for preventing the growth of positive elements, 
even though the main problem is not only in this area and must 
also be sought in other areas of the Voice and Vision. In other 
words, technical weakness alone is not the cause of the absence 
of faithful forces, but the small number of faithful people, the 
change of ideas of some of our own people, and also the 
necessity of producing programs for all levels, strata, and 
tastes in the society require the Voice and Vision to accept the 
participation of and cooperation of other elements who are not 
ours. Of course, the above-mentioned indicators should not be an 
excuse to evade the grave duties and responsibilities that the 
revolution has placed on the shoulders of the officials of this 
extraordinarily sensitive organization. The element of 
management, training, and valuing faithful elements, the change 
of some existing policies and actions, the strengthening of the 
authentic beliefs and ideas of the revolution and Islam, and 
research and study of the new harmless methods of employing 
artists and experts who are not ours will have an effect in the 
change of the structure of the Voice and Vision organization, 
and in this way, the Ministry of Information in turn, and on the 
basis of the mission of guarding the values and ideals of the 
revolution, will not hesitate in rendering any sort of 
assistance. It is hoped that this brief report will be the 
source of good reform and constructive change in the cultural 
arena of the society and will not be regarded as a means to 
weaken the serving Voice and Vision organization. 
<H5>  Conforming to the Laws and the Statements of the Grand Leader </H5>
  The grand leader on occasions has given opinions and 
directives to the Voice and Vision organization or its director. 
Unfortunately, the instructions and directives of his honor were 
not implemented. For example: 
  On 02/06/1368 [24 August 1989], when, in accordance with a 
decree, Mr. Hashemi was appointed as the director of the 
organization, he was asked to rapidly prepare a bill concerning 
the administration of the Voice and Vision to present to the 
government and the Majles for ratification, which has not been 
done yet. 
  From 1368 [21 March 1989-20 March 1990] to 1370 [21 March 
1990-20 March 1991], he made reminders to the Voice and Vision 
on 14 occasions, the most important of which concern: 
  A) Misinformation. 
  B) The low level of quality of the beyond-the-border 
programs 
and failure to propagate and spread Islamic ideas and views in 
them. 
  C) The broadcast of blasphemous sentences concerning the 
Sire 
of the Pious, such as Our Sire 'Ali, which his honor wrote, and 
the broadcast by the Voice and Vision of exaggerated poems that 
are sometimes almost blasphemous must be prohibited. 
  D) The use of non-Islamic terminology, such as, May your 
days 
be for Ahura. 
  E) Showing actual persons in the role of the infallible 
imams. 
  F) The broadcast of repetitive sad and noneducational films, 
in which case it is not clear to what extent the directives of 
the grand leader are noted. 
  The Voice and Vision organization is responsible for 
carrying 
out the ratifications of the Policymaking Council. According to 
the chairman of the council, most of the ratifications have not 
been announced by the director of the organization to the 
related units and subsequently they were not being implemented. 
For example, one of the ratifications of the Policymaking 
Council was the presentation of the picture of ideal Islamic 
women. Unfortunately, in the production and broadcast of 
programs, no hopeful action or effort towards the implementation 
of the Islamic and legal policies, programs, and goals is 
observed. 
  In examining the activities of the management of the 
organization and conformity or lack of conformity of them with 
the law, we see problems indicating lack of attention to legal 
issues which are stated in Articles 1, 2, 21, 22, 23, 27, 30, 
33, 45, 46, and 62. Also, by reviewing the law of the Charter of 
the Voice and Vision organization, in comparison with the 
activities of the organization important instances of violations 
or lack of conformity to the law can be seen. According to 
Paragraph 8, Article 17 of this law, the director-general of the 
organization is responsible to report in writing the operations 
of the organization bimonthly to the Supervisory Council, and 
the Supervisory Council must report in writing the operations of 
the organization to the three branches in accordance with 
Paragraph 14, Article 16. But they have not carried out this 
duty. Also, based on Article 26, the deputy offices of the 
organization are limited to six. But without a legal permit, the 
director of the organization has added other offices. 
  In examining the two transmitters of the organization in 
Sirjan, we see lack of expertise, repetitive work, and slowdowns 
in work by the supervisory companies, the contractor, and the 
organization itself in building the short- and to some extent 
the medium-wave transmitters. Also, millions of dollars of 
equipment in boxes are abandoned in the open without protection, 
which results in significant losses to the Treasury. 
  In the collapse of the satellite [building], which crumbled 
two days after it was inaugurated by the high-ranking officials 
of the country, the events are documented in the National 
Inspection File, in which the summary of the letter of the 
National Inspection organization to the director of the 
organization and the summary of the letter of the director or of 
the organization to the director of national inspectors are 
mentioned. The summary of the letter of the National Inspection 
[organization]: The National Inspection organization, 
considering 11 reasons, has determined the issue of the 
crumbling of the satellite building an issue to be discussed and 
examined by proper judicial authorities and sent it to the 
Tehran Public Prosecutor's Office for prosecution. The most 
important reasons are as follows: 
  1) Inexperience of the implementor of the project in 
carrying 
out the project. 
  2) Failure to choose and ensure the presence of a 
supervisory 
engineer. 
  3) Weakness and failure to observe technical principles. 
  4) About 80 percent of cracks and rust in the places that 
were welded. 
  5) Nonconformity of the concrete pouring with the 
calculations of engineers. 
  6) Lack of preparing a building plan to carry out the 
project. 
  7) Existence of cracks and breakage in some of the parts of 
the building prior to the occurrence of the earthquake. 
  8) Announcement of the breakage of the windows of the 
building prior to the gradual settlement of the building and 
other reasons that are included in the file. 
  The summary of the letter of Mr. Hashemi to the director of 
the National Inspection organization: 
  He has not accepted the possibility of error in calculations 
and the possibility of failure to carefully implement the 
project in accordance with the opinion of the calculating 
engineer, regarded the crumbling of the building as the result 
of the earthquake with a vertical strike and, although he has 
accepted some errors in action by the implementor, he has not 
considered it due to ill intentions. Compared to other work done 
by the implementor, which has all been good, he has considered 
the damages resulting from the crumbling of the satellite 
building as minor and does not consider anyone guilty and 
prosecutable. The director of the organization resorts to the 
report of a group of engineers affiliated with the organization. 
He regards the report of the engineers who investigated the 
violations, the security official, and the Construction College 
of Amir Kabir University a bunch of statements heard from a 
worker's foreman. 
<H5>  Security of the Voice and Vision </H5>
  Since the existence of security in the Voice and Vision is 
very important, because this organization has always been a 
target for foreign and domestic enemies, and regardless of the 
physical security which is necessary, the existence of a 
powerful security that can oversee the actions and behavior of 
the managers and personnel of this organization is not unclear 
to anyone. Concerning the reports that reached the Investigation 
Committee regarding the managers, directors, and producers 
mainly of the Vision, about 40 of them were in sensitive and key 
positions. The committee prepared a report on their activities 
and in meetings that were held early on with the Committee on 
Administrative Violations of the organization, the 
above-mentioned committee stated that the issues that are 
mentioned in regard to the violations and incompetence of the 
individuals are verified. In numerous sessions that we had with 
the acting director of security of the organization, first he 
verified the instances in the reports concerning the 
above-mentioned 40 individuals and promised that a completed and 
approved report would be prepared from the files of the 
above-mentioned individuals for the committee. But, 
unfortunately, after nearly five sessions, ultimately no 
cooperation with the committee was provided by the security of 
the above-mentioned organization, and a number of empty folders 
that only included the birth certificate information of those 
individuals were offered to the committee, which were declined 
by the members of the committee because they were useless. 
Later, it became clear that about 150 files on violators were 
removed from the organization by the former head of security. 
  According to the investigations of the committee, the 
Security Office of the organization from 1360 [21 March 1981-20 
March 1982] on has been completely obedient to the instructions 
of the general manager, and the appointment of security 
officials did not receive the necessary approval from the 
Ministry of Information (contrary to the law), and unfortunately 
no meaningful and regular action was taken to collect 
information on the violations of individuals, or if it was done 
to some extent, so far they have avoided presenting such 
information to the Ministry of Information or other legal 
authorities. At the same time, a number of managers and 
employees of the Voice and Vision have files in the 
Administrative Violations Court or have even been dismissed from 
the organization or have violation files in the prosecutor's 
offices and there is no sign of their files in Security. 
Security is carried out upon the wish and agreement of the 
general manager. 
  The files of a number of individuals were requested from the 
general administrative director, who at first only provided the 
committee with one file. Due to the shortage of time, the 
reading of that file and other files was postponed to the 
following day. On the following day, when in accordance with a 
previous appointment coordinated with the deputy director for 
parliamentary affairs, they went to the Central Administrative 
Office, unfortunately the above-mentioned general director was 
not in his office, and later when he was asked over the 
telephone for his cooperation, he refused to do so, and even the 
files of the personnel were not placed at the disposal of the 
committee. 
  Hence, the committee through unofficial channels and use of 
tangible and intangible methods continued its investigation 
about the managers of the organization and those in sensitive 
positions. Below, mention is made of the files of a few people. 
Before engaging in the discussion, it is necessary to clarify 
the climate of the Vision of the Islamic Republic to some extent 
for the honorable audience. 
<H5>  Atmosphere of the Vision </H5>
  In numerous visits of the members of the committee to the 
various buildings of the Vision of the Islamic Republic, in the 
buildings, the outside space, the hallways, and workshops were 
unfortunately empty of any Islamic and revolutionary signs. 
Except in the rooms of a number of managers, there were no signs 
of pictures of the Imam and the grand leader and in the 
administrative offices of the warehouses, which were like those 
above, on the wall of the administrative hall, the committee saw 
the picture of a foreign female tennis player who was, 
unfortunately, playing tennis in seminaked dress. 
  All the secretaries of the organization, from the highest 
level on down, were women employees, who considering the 
relationship and contacts that these secretaries have with one 
another have an effect on the decisions of the managers of the 
organization. 
  The official veiling in the Vision is a scarf and a manteau 
and a very small number who are not seen in the organizations 
use chadors. Unfortunately, most of the sisters who had first 
gone to the organization with chadors, as a result of the 
atmosphere of the organization, have been forced to use scarves 
or manteaus. A clear example is that in the past 10 years, while 
the women newscasters of the vision all appeared on television 
screen with scarves and manteaus, when as a result of various 
pressures imposed on the organization they allowed a sister to 
report the news in full Islamic cover and chador, after the 
first session, she was attacked in the hallways of the 
organization by a number of women employees as to why she had 
reported the news in a chador. 
  1) In Esfand 1368 [20 February-20 March 1990], some of the 
equipment of the Vision organization of the Islamic Republic was 
sold on the market and by contacting the Tehran public 
prosecutor, the general manager asked that the matter be pursued 
and those who caused the theft of the property be arrested. In a 
few days, the support and technical official of the Voice and 
Vision and two other employees of the Voice and Vision were 
arrested and all confessed to embezzlement of five items 
belonging to the Voice and Vision and to drinking wine. The 
related interrogator issued the order for the arrest and they 
were forced to return the stolen property. After the arrest, 
unfortunately, the pressure and imposition by the high- ranking 
officials of the Voice and Vision to acquit the support and 
technical official of the Voice and Vision began. 
  In a letter, No. 37/189/M, dated 30/02/1369 [20 May 1990], 
the honorable general manager of the Voice and Vision thanks the 
prosecutor of Tehran and all those involved for recovering the 
property of the Voice and Vision, but, unfortunately, despite 
the fact that according to the confession of the accused, the 
logistics official was in charge and had the key to the 
warehouse, he was returned to the Voice and Vision, and the 
other accused, who have committed lesser crimes, were dismissed 
from the organization. Ultimately, the logistics official, as 
one of the managers of the organization, while retaining his 
position, was sent to Mecca for two years consecutively as the 
head of the Voice and Vision group, and on 13/06/1371 [5 October 
1992] through the office of the general manager of the 
organization, the general deputy director of the Justice 
Department of Tehran Province is informed that the Voice and 
Vision organization has changed its mind in regards to its 
complaint against the logistics official, and, unfortunately, in 
the midst of the astonishment of the employees of the Vision of 
the Islamic Republic, he is installed in an important position 
and begins to work. He has taken numerous trips to Europe, some 
of which lasted from one to three months. Due to lack of 
cooperation of the central administrative office, the details of 
the trips are not available. The file of the above-mentioned 
person has been acquired from the prosecutor's office and is 
available. In Paragraph 10, the report of the official 
authorities considers him a smoker of opium and as having 
illegitimate relations with women. 
  2) The deputy director for training of the organization 
proposed to the general manager of the organization that 
selections be made from the entering students of the college of 
the organization, which was agreed to by the general manager and 
protested by the Supreme Selection Committee and the Islamic 
Students Association. 
  The above-mentioned, who was also in charge of the ski 
federation in the winter games in Japan that were held a few 
years ago, despite the fact that the national athletic 
organization had asked the official holding the game for a man 
to carry the flag for the Iranian athletes and they had agreed 
to it, when he arrived in Japan, he insisted that like other 
countries, the Iranian flag should be carried by a woman, which 
was not agreed to by the officials of the game since they said 
that they did not have the time to train a new person. From 
Japan, a picture that he had taken with a Japanese woman was 
sent to the organization, which others saw as well. 
<H5>  Mobilization in the Voice and Vision Organization </H5>
  The following report was prepared by one of the brothers who 
served for several years in the mobilization of the organization. 
  The mobilization in the Voice and Vision organization began 
in 1359 [21 March 1980-20 March 1981] before the start of the 
imposed war, on the order of Imam Khomeyni concerning the 
establishment of the 20-million large army with the efforts of 
the faithful and Hezbollah forces, and no steps or support was 
made by the officials of the organization. This institution, 
with efforts and initiative and use of policy and ingenuity in 
all cultural, military, administrative and financial areas, has 
been able to gain a suitable position in the organization and 
become trusted by the employees of the organization. From the 
beginning of his arrival at the organization, the director of 
the organization has not had any favorable view of the 
organizational work of the mobilization in the organization and 
has not made any contacts. In the few contacts with him, 
whenever there has been talk of the organization and financial 
needs and resources, he has somehow passed by the issue and 
relied on superficial slogans and matters. In connection with 
making an appointment with him to discuss problems, it would 
sometimes take a year, and after a lengthy pursuit, he would set 
a limited amount of time. At the end of a session, there would 
be no moral and normal support for this institution, but 
weakness and regret. In regards to the resources of the 
mobilization, by making use of appropriate situations and 
establishing relations with low-level managers, we have been 
able to acquire rooms and other resources. On several occasions, 
the head of the organization has issued written instructions to 
take away all the resources from the mobilization. Considering 
the waste and excessive expenditures of the organization, so 
far, after 13 years not 1 rial has been paid to brothers working 
in the mobilization as salary, bonus, or benefits, and 
essentially he does not consider the mobilization as a permanent 
and favorable organization within the organization, but as a 
secondary and even troublesome one, but he does not have the 
courage to say it openly. 
<H5>  Report on the Voice and Vision College </H5>
  The Voice and Vision College operates in a rented building, 
which resembles a residential place, and in the course of 15 
years since the revolution, no steps have been taken to build a 
suitable college. 
  Also, due to the shortage of funds the educational equipment 
is so old and worn out that it is not suitable for teaching and 
does not have a good return. In Zibakenar, a place has been 
projected for teaching that is mostly like a recreational 
coastal complex and is not appropriate for an educational 
environment. The library of the college in terms of location, 
books, and allocated funds is not appropriate with the goals of 
the organization and training of students. It can be said that 
research in the college is nonexistent. 
  Management: In the organization of the college, a board of 
directors has not been projected, and the president of the 
college is selected by the educational deputy of the Voice and 
Vision. Except for the technical manager, who has a doctorate, 
the rest of the managers have masters degrees. Even though in 
terms of the current operation of the affairs there are no 
problems, due to the great mission of the Voice and Vision 
organization, and in terms of scientific planning and technical 
knowledge, higher educational degrees are required to run the 
scientific affairs of the college. 
  Since the college is under the direct supervision and 
specific policies of the educational deputy director of the 
organization, it is necessary to see who is the highest 
authority of decision making and direction for the training of 
the most important cultural and artistic strategies of the 
country. 
  The educational deputy director of the organization was 
first 
in charge of the facilities in the technical division of the 
organization. His specialization is electricity. Then he was put 
in charge of developmental projects, including the building of 
the Satellite Building, which crumbled two weeks ago and could 
have been one of the bloodiest accidents of the revolution, 
because two days prior to the crumbling, all the foreign 
ambassadors, attaches, and high-ranking representatives along 
with the high-ranking officials and, most important, the 
president and general managers of the Voice and Vision gathered 
in that building. He implemented the project of the Zibakenar 
Villas, which in order to avoid disgrace called it an 
educational center, but in practice remained recreational and 
became a shelter for the rich employees of the organization, so 
that while the country was being threatened, they could swim and 
have fun there. Many problems occurred there, including the 
drinking of wine, not observing veiling, lack of control over 
mixing men and women during swimming. 
  He regularly travels abroad under various pretexts and is 
especially interested in Japan. His harsh and offensive dealings 
with the Hezbollah brothers and sisters are known throughout the 
organization. His de-Islamization in his area of activities is 
evident in the statistics on the dismissal of religious and 
committed individuals and the compulsory transfer of some of 
them, putting environmental pressure on institutions such as the 
Guard Corps, 15 Khordad, etc., giving orders to remove the 
pictures of martyr Dr. Beheshti from the walls, and other cases. 
  The educational officials mostly have a reactionary 
bureaucratic attitude in regards to the educational deputy, lack 
of control of uncensored films for students, the existence of 
connections instead of regulations, harsh and offensive behavior 
towards students, inattention to the training of students, 
discrimination in giving service to students, disregard for 
distinguished professors, etc. 
  Mr. H., the educational deputy of the organization, believes 
that the college is attended to, that a long-term human model is 
being prepared and published, and admitting students will be on 
that basis. [sentence as published]. 
  The Voice and Vision College is one of the most costly and 
in 
terms of resources one of the best colleges in Iran. Mr. 
Hashemi, the general manager of the organization, says: We give 
the necessary value to the college, to the best of our ability. 
In terms of the student-teacher ratio, it is better than at 
other colleges. Educational resources and equipment are at a 
desirable level, but the limitations due to the problems of the 
country naturally affect the situation of the college. The 
center of all the problems of the Voice and Vision, including 
the college, is shortage of funds. 
  Considering the great role of the organization, which is 
itself a university as large as Iran, overall planning for the 
next 20 years and preparing suitable manpower is extremely 
important, because we know that without providing the suitable 
and competent work force, any practical planning will be 
neutralized in the future. 
  The professors have not been hired through the 
administration 
for the selection of professors and therefore are not subject to 
the existing definitions in higher education with regard to the 
members of the faculty. This has caused them to despair and in 
this connection to be deprived of study leaves. 
  Among the professors, we see Easternized and Westernized 
individuals who, considering their intellectual and 
psychological characteristics, ridicule the Hezbollah forces and 
drag them into isolation and boycott in various ways. For 
example, Ms. S.A. has spoken so much in the class about marriage 
and the problems of married life that she has attracted the 
attention of the boys; or Mr. B. in one of the sessions has 
tried to prove the necessity of suicide in some junctures in 
life and said that Takhti committed suicide. Some professors 
have come from places where their competence has not been 
approved. 
  Students generally complain about the shortage of student 
aid, the climate of the village, the library, courses, cleaning 
the cafeteria and dormitory, lack of attention to prayers, lack 
of a place for washing for prayer for the sisters, etc. 
  The next session of the report on the inquiry and 
investigation will be in tomorrow's issue. 
  [4 Nov pp 5, 6, 15] 
  [Text] Legislative and Parliamentary Affairs 
Division.med&gt; 
  The Majles held an open session yesterday. The open session 
started later than usual and for this reason the pre-agenda 
speakers did not speak. Then the speaker of the Majles honored 
the anniversary of 13 Aban [4 November], the anniversary of 
fighting the United States, the details of which were published 
yesterday. Then the Majles went into session and the 
continuation of the inquiry and investigation concerning the 
activities of the Voice and Vision was read from the Majles 
podium. We call to your attention the details of the discussion. 
<H3>  Second Part of the Inquiry and Investigation Report of the 
Majles Concerning the Activities of the Voice and Vision </H3>
<H3>  Report on the Financial Situation of the Voice and Vision of 
the Islamic Republic of the Islamic Republic </H3>
  Despite the lack of cooperation of the auditor of the Voice 
and Vision with the committee, the Inquiry and Investigation 
Committee succeeded in reporting the financial situation of the 
organization by collecting correct information and making use of 
the efforts of the accounting office. 
  According to the law of the charter of the Voice and Vision 
organization, which was ratified on 27/07/1362 [19 October 1983] 
by the honorable Majles, some of the duties and authority of the 
Supervisory Council are determined as follows: 
  1) Examination and approval of the annual budget of the 
Voice 
and Vision, which is proposed by the general manager. 
  2) Examination and approval of the annual report on the 
activities, the balance sheet, and the profit and loss account 
of the organization and affiliated companies. 
  The general manager of the organization is responsible and 
must respond to the Supervisory Council and must carry out all 
the ratifications of that council. 
  The general manager of the organization must present the 
list 
of the activities of every fiscal year of the organization and 
the related balance sheet concerning the affiliated 
organizations before the end of Khordad [21 June] of the 
following year to the Supervisory Council, and the council is 
responsible for giving its opinion by the end of Tir [22 July] 
every year in regards to the financial operations of the 
previous year with attention to the inspection (auditing) report. 
  On the other hand, according to Article 138 of the general 
accounting law of the country, the Voice and Vision is 
considered a government company none of whose financial lists 
and those of its affiliated companies have been approved and 
ratified by the Supervisory Council since 1361 [21 March 1982-20 
March 1983]. 
  The reforms and changes were merely done based on the 
opinion 
and approval of the management and even without consulting the 
Supervisory Council, the position of "internal auditing," which 
operated under its supervision and as a control and supervisory 
unit, was eliminated in 1365 [21 March 1986-20 March 1987] and 
instead the evaluation and financial operation unit under the 
supervision of the General Financial and Auditing Affairs Office 
has been created. In fact, it has acted as a government 
institution (and not a company). 
  Essentially, the management of the Voice and Vision since 
the 
beginning has not regarded itself as a company in practice. An 
example of it is preparation of an accounting list of revenues 
and expenditures instead of a profit and loss account. Hence, 
even though the organization until the end of 1367 [21 March 
1988-20 March 1989] has had 16,500,891,339 rials[Rls] annual 
profit (more than the capital), it has never included the taxes 
of the company, even though the financial operations of the 
organization are carried out as a company. It has always wanted 
to have full authority of a government establishment, as a 
director. This kind of thinking is current in the whole body of 
the management of the organizations. 
  After the revolution, the operations of the organization 
have 
not been inspected, audited, and examined by any authority and 
merely have been signed by the general management of the 
organization by preparing financial lists by the auditing office. 
  The budget of the organization is in a centralized form and 
the current budget proposed by the organization (expenditures) 
for 1368 [21 March 1989-20 March 1990] has been estimated to be 
Rls41,565,609 thousand [as published] (without including 
Rls10,771,768 thousand [as published] of the proposed 
expenditures that will not be put at the disposal of the 
organization). Also, the foreign currency budget needed by the 
organization is projected to be $60,675, for which (resources) 
Rls800,000 are from special revenue sources and the rest from 
government help. Whereas the special revenues of the 
organization in 1367 [21 March 1988-20 March 1989] were more 
than Rls2 billion and in the years 1368 and 1369 [21 March 
1990-20 March 1991], nearly Rls3 and Rls4 billion, respectively, 
it has always been reflected less in the budget projections in 
order to increase aid received by the government. 
  Because of the special system governing the Voice and 
Vision, 
the accounting body has only examined the General Accounting 
Unit that has the current account and there is no information 
concerning the activities and nature of the accounts of the 25 
radio and television centers and other Tehran units. 
  It can be seen that the ratified budget of the main line of 
the organization in 1368 was exactly the same as 1367, but in 
1369 and 1370 [21 March 1991-20 March 1992], compared to 1368, 
has had a growth of 60.5 and 84.55 percent, respectively. Also, 
the ratified developmental budget of the organization in 1368 
had a growth of nearly 25 percent compared to 1367 but more than 
95 percent and 200 percent compared to 1369 and 1370. In any 
case, in 1368, the total revenues of the organization were 
Rls29,444,646,071 and the total expenditures Rls20,874,859,703, 
and consequently has had a loss of Rls1,430,213,632. 
  In 1367, even though the level of government help compared 
to 
1368 has increased by more than 60 percent, the difference 
between the revenues and expenditures was only Rls1,823,100,378. 
  The losses in 1367 also were Rls463,167,783. It needs to be 
explained that the accumulated profit of the organization at the 
end of 1366 [21 March 1987-20 March 1988] was Rls17,197,705,389. 
By including the losses of 1367 and 1368 and the profit of 1369, 
the difference between revenues and expenditures (in fact 
accumulated profit of the organization) at the end of 1369 was 
Rls16,500,819,339. 
  The remainder of the account of miscellaneous debtors to the 
organization at the end of 1368 was Rls13,090,910,232 and the 
balance of the accounts of debtors of advertisements to the 
organization at the end of 1368 was Rls562,360,017. Hence, the 
balance of the account of the debtors to the organization at the 
end of 1368 was Rls13,653,270,349, which is precisely 5 percent 
of it, that is, Rls682,663,512 in reserves for questionable 
accounts receivable. 
  In examining the activities of the Tehran unit, it can be 
seen that the balance of the account of miscellaneous debtors is 
Rls3,033,254,198, and the balance of the accounts of 
advertisement debts in the Tehran unit was totally 
Rls3,459,475,420, which is about one-fourth of the total 
remainder of the debit account of the organization. 
  In examining the auxiliary accounts it can be seen that 
there 
were many false and fabricated figures. Especially in pursuing 
the matter it becomes clear that the nature of many of the 
figures in the accounts are unspecific and concern the years 
prior to 1361, which cannot be verified. These kinds of figures 
are transferred into the books without any action, as before. 
Hence, even though the audit of the committee concerned 1368, 
because the above- mentioned organization has not been audited 
and examined after the revolution and because of not 
understanding the nature of the financial activities of the 
organization in the past years, in most cases the extent of the 
investigations by the committee had to be mostly 1361 [21 March 
1982-20 March 1983] to 1370 [21 March 1991-20 March 1992] and in 
some cases also include the years prior to the revolution. 
Naturally, access to the documents and books of the past years 
was not without problems. 
  In any case, in the auxiliary accounts of miscellaneous 
debts 
to the Tehran accounting unit it can be seen that for the 
Central Bank, Rls1,789,491; five different branches of the Melli 
Bank, a total of Rls40,967,058; and the Commerce Bank, Bazaar 
Branch, Rls5,114,500 were owed the organization due to the 
differences in the account and the financial officials of the 
Vision confess that because the accounts of the banking system 
of the country are correct and are prepared daily, naturally 
such differences are to our benefit. Nevertheless, no 
appropriate steps have been taken to eliminate them. 
  The Physical Fitness organization owes Rls60 million for the 
sale of an athletic field, whereas no such transaction has taken 
place at all and the check is at the disposal of the legal 
office of the Voice and Vision. 
  Since 1357 [21 March 1978-20 March 1979] the Pars Auditing 
Institute has owed Rls4,500,000. If the above-mentioned 
institute has not carried out the duties conferred on it, why 
has the organization not taken any steps to receive the auditing 
report or the amount owed it? And if the above-mentioned 
establishment has done the duties conferred on it, why have no 
steps been taken so far to correct the account (changing it to 
expenditures)? And there are many cases that indicate debts by 
government organizations and establishments, which were 
transferred in the books precisely, and it is not clear to what 
extent and at what amounts these accounts are falsified. 
  At the end of 1368 (and also 1369), the Telefilm Company 
owed 
Rls265,292,225 to the organization. 
  With a brief examination it becomes clear that according to 
document No. 600, dated 31/06/1360 [22 September 1981] 
(concerning the transfer of the remainder of 1359 accounts), the 
258,407,086-rial balance of the prepayment account of the 
above-mentioned company has been transferred from 1359 [21 March 
1980-20 March 1981] and ultimately according to document No. 
8095, dated 27/12/1364 [18 March 1986], the balance of the 
prepayment account of the above-mentioned company has been 
corrected by Rls265,292,225 in the debit account (which has been 
shown 30,000 less in the auxiliary account) and since that time 
have been transferred in the books exactly. The explanation is 
that in none of the documents of the years examined is the issue 
of prepayments clear. 
  It should be added that at the end of 1364 [20 March 1986], 
some of the prepayment accounts of establishments and 
individuals have been corrected in the miscellaneous debit 
account. Because of various reasons (including that he was not 
the official at the time and knows nothing about it) the 
financial affairs officials presented no explanation in this 
regard, and the opinion of the committee is that those debts 
were not determined to be collectible. 
  The list of actual debtor individuals is very long and 
heavy. 
Among those who owe over Rls1 million to the organization, 58 
cases have been identified, including: 
  The general manager of the organization at the time of the 
Tyrant owes Rls3,097,669, as well as other individuals 
affiliated with the previous regime who have had no relationship 
with the organization after the revolution and the legal office 
of the organization has taken no steps to collect the debts. 
Only the auditing office transfers these debts in the books year 
after year. 
  Another person owes the organization Rls100 million. After 
investigations, it became clear that he had sold two pieces of 
land to the Voice and Vision in 1357, and the ownership of the 
lands was transferred to the Voice and Vision officially and 
buildings were also constructed on them. Nevertheless, during 
these 15 years, the Voice and Vision has yet taken no steps to 
correct the account and eliminate the debt of the 
above-mentioned person. 
  In examining the nature of the debt of individuals, various 
cases can be cited. For example, one man owes Rls10,373,502, 
including a loan for Rls400,000 received in 1358 [21 March 
1979-20 March 1980] from the special fund and budget. In 1360 
[21 March 1981-20 March 1982], for returning an illegal secret 
bonus, Rls192,000 has been removed from his debt, the balance of 
the debt being from before the revolution, the nature of which 
is not clear, and from 1361 [21 March 1982-20 March 1983] no 
action has been taken to collect it and only the balance of his 
debt has been transferred in the books. 
  The debt of a person from 1361 for Rls59,066,644 (apparently 
his debt is in connection with the release of goods), which has 
not yet been settled, and so forth. 
  Another owes Rls9,353,774 since 1362 [21 March 1983-20 March 
1984]. A cursory examination clearly reveals that the balance of 
his prepayment in 1356 [21 March 1977-20 March 1978] was 
Rls7,740,776 and in 1357, Rls750,000 as a car loan and also in 
1358 other amounts for his travels and telephone bills abroad 
have been included in his prepayment account. In 1360, upon the 
request of the Purging Council, the amount of Rls1,093,000 was 
included as a return of an illegal bonus to his account and 
ultimately the balance of his prepayment in 1362 was transferred 
to the debtors' account, and from then on, the organization has 
taken no steps to collect the debt. 
  An employee of the organization owes Rls7,438,251 from 1361. 
If this amount of debt is real, why is it not deducted from his 
salary and benefits or fees for producing programs? And there 
are many other cases. 
  An examination of the account reveals that debts of the 
organization to some individuals concern prior to 1353 [21 March 
1974-20 March 1975] or some individuals in the accounts are owed 
several million rials by the organization. If this is true, why 
has no step been taken to collect it? For example, two women and 
one male employee working in the organization are apparently 
owed Rls4 million, Rls2 million, and Rls1.5 million, 
respectively. The nature of these debts (of the organization) is 
unclear. In this connection, the financial officials say that 
because the organization is comprised of units, an individual 
may owe one unit and then transfer to another unit where he 
deposits his debt, but since the reason for the deposit was 
unclear, it went into his credit account in the new unit. 
Unfortunately, we heard a great deal of this kind of 
explanation, and no decisive steps have been taken. 
  The balance of the revolving funds account of the 
organization (with the main code 115) at the end of 1368 [20 
March 1990] was Rls290,563,476. Whereas the funds for the 
emergency expenditures of the units and also to the purchasing 
agents in accordance with the bylaws and at a maximum amount of 
Rls500,000 can be paid (according to the bylaws, the funds of 
the organization can be increased up to this amount with the 
written permission of the auditor), and the accounts payable 
must be settled at the end of the year, about 22 persons owe 
more than the amount of Rls500,000 in funds received. Of course, 
in some of the units, including the Tehran accounting unit, 
transfer the deposited and unsettled funds at the end of the 
year in the miscellaneous debit account to deep up appearances. 
  Some cases are also seen in which the amount of the accounts 
payable exceed the allowable level, including one man who 
received 1,500,000 in funds. According to the bylaws of the 
funds of the organization, if the amount of the funds exceeds 
Rls300,000, it is necessary to acquire a promissory note in the 
amount of the funds signed by the receiver as a guarantee made 
out to the organization, whereas the promissory note from that 
person is Rls500,000. Considering the remainder of the revolving 
funds of the person from the previous years, the balance of his 
account at the end of 1369 [20 March 1991] reached 
Rls17,377,457, which is absolutely contrary to the nature of the 
revolving fund account, or to another person, Rls2 million in 
funds was paid, and there are other cases. 
  The balance of the fund account of Mr. Mohammad Hashemi, the 
general manager of the organization (the present director), from 
1364 [21 March 1985-20 March 1986] to 1370 [21 March 1991-20 
March 1992] has been calculated and is mostly in foreign 
currency, but no steps have generally been taken to deposit or 
settle them. For example, one item in the amount of Rls4,500,000 
for procuring 400 Spring of Freedom coins for New Year gifts and 
bonuses for employees were recorded in early 1369 (he received 
the coins in late 1368), but after that year, it is still not 
clear to whom these coins were given. The balance of his 
account, with the code 125, at the end of 1369 was Rls7,521,337. 
  The balance of the funds account of the organization (with 
the main code of 111) at the end of 1368 was Rls26,449,598 and 
the balance of the above-mentioned account in the Tehran 
accounting unit was Rls11,595,749, which is the balance of the 
accounts of three cashiers, and also 20 Spring of Freedom coins 
(10 of them are in the form of invoices), which were transferred 
from 1364 [21 March 1985-20 March 1986] and so far no steps have 
been taken to settle it. 
  During the change of cashiers, usually there are 
discrepancies in the accounts. For example, one cashier in the 
first half of 1369 handed his cash box to another, and according 
to the auxiliary book, he owes Rls2,773,904, but he claims that 
he owes Rls94,665. Because of such discrepancies (which are 
evident in other accounts of the Voice and Vision in many 
instances) no essential steps have been taken to eliminate the 
discrepancies in the accounts and settle the debts. 
  Payments from this fund are made, including the 
reimbursement 
of 80 percent of health care for the employees, which according 
to the existing bylaws is the responsibility of the 
organization. But in some cases, the organization accepts all 
the treatment costs of the employee. Among them are the 
documents in 1368, Nos. 254, 200, 867, etc., for which no 
justification has been offered. 
  At the end of 1367, the balance of the accounts receivable 
was Rls1,223,195, which was closed with the account of creditors 
and next year was reopened exactly the same way. The reason was 
the failure to record some of the payments to the cashiers in 
the books. So far, there has never been any control over the 
collections and payments of the cashiers by the Auditing Office 
and the list of the number of funds has not been prepared. 
  The remainder of the prepayment of the organization in 1368 
was Rls3,159,855, which includes three main accounts. 
  Prepayment to (official) employees with the main code 123, 
at 
Rls509,256,414. 
  Miscellaneous prepayments (to nonofficial and 
nonorganizational persons) with the main code 124, at 
Rls1,224,855,591. 
  Prepayment of programs with the main code of 125 (concerning 
the Unit for Program Affairs), at Rls1,425,743,811. 
  The remainder of the first two accounts in the Tehran 
accounting unit are Rls187,239,742 and Rls362,464,551, 
respectively. In the above-mentioned accounts, the assignment 
fees, treatment fees, partial payment on salaries, some loans, 
and other debts of the individuals are recorded. 
  In a brief examination of the prepayments to employees, we 
see that in 1368, there were about 5,000 people who had 
prepayment accounts, of which about 4,000 cases at the end of 
the year had a debt balance and about 705 remaining credit and 
the rest had been settled. In order to understand the nature of 
the accounts, some examples of the balances above Rls1 million 
were chosen and examined. 
  The remainder of the prepayment of Mr. Mohammad Hashemi, 
with 
the code 12300153, at the end of 1368 was Rls5,546,263, and at 
the end of 1369, Rls9,471,963, which were mainly put at his 
disposal as extra payments in rials in the equivalent of foreign 
currency for assignments abroad in the form of funds for his 
expenditures, and so far no steps have been taken in regards to 
reports on the assignment or presenting documents of 
expenditures to settle the foreign currency funds, which have 
been requested frequently by the Central Bank. In addition, some 
of the prepayment accounts of Mr. Hashemi related to the 
calculation of the price of 500 Spring of Freedom half coins 
were given to him in accordance with document No. 6761 in 1361 
[21 March 1982-20 March 1983] and also 300 Spring [of Freedom] 
coins were given to him in 1369 in accordance with document No. 
7849, and so far he has taken no steps even to settle the 
account of the assignments that took place several years ago. He 
has not even yet requested the list of those who received the 
coins and has not calculated the cost even from 1366 [21 March 
1987-20 March 1988] All these problems and weaknesses are due to 
the fact that the auditor of the organization has always been an 
obedient employee of the organization rather than being assigned 
by the Ministry of Economic Affairs and Finance. 
  The balance of the prepayment of one of the gentlemen with 
Code 12325063 at the end of 1368 was Rls2,689,414. Most of these 
payments were for extra pay for assignments abroad at $130 per 
diem and foreign currency payments to him in funds. Since the 
assignments, the management of the organization in regards to 
the verification of the assignments or the auditor has not taken 
any step to receive the documents of expenditures to settle the 
foreign currency funds. He has had numerous long-term 
assignments to visit radio and television centers in foreign 
countries, visit exhibitions, and inspect the Voice and Vision 
offices abroad and of course mostly for treatment of his 
illness, including eight documents regarding 1364 to 1369 at a 
total of $27,600 for traveling to China, Japan, England, 
Germany, Istanbul, Damascus, Beirut, and Larnaca. On some of 
these travels, which were for medical treatment, he was 
accompanied by his wife and child for treatment. 
  The balance of the payments of a woman at the end of 1368 
was 
Rls356,454. In following up the nature of this payment and 
examining document No. 6565 of 1368, it can be seen that 
physicians under contract with the organization requested the 
management of the organization to participate in the annual 
conference in San Francisco in connection with infertility 
research and also requested that that woman, due to a long 
history of infertility and the opposition of the Medical 
Council, be sent to the United States. She was sent abroad, 
along with her husband, and they each received $3,500 for 
treatment. 
  In examining the documents of expenditures deposited in Nos. 
4820 and 4833 in 1369, it can be seen that the Ministry of 
Health has opposed sending the above to the United States and 
agreed to send them to Australia, provided they receive no 
government foreign currency and go there with personal funds, 
whereas the organization took steps to send them on official 
assignment for 50 days, with a per diem of $100. Because the 
Central Bank has paid only $70 of the per diem due to foreign 
currency restrictions (a total of $7,000) in accordance with its 
internal regulations, the organization has paid the difference 
between $70 and $100. 
  In later investigations we found documents that indicate the 
sending of medical teams abroad, including to the United States, 
to participate in research seminars and courses. For example, 
Mr. J., the head of the Voice and Vision, along with nine other 
physicians, including Ms. F.K. (naturally not all of them 
specialize in female problems) and one engineer (considering 
that this was an engineer and not a physician, most likely he, 
is a relative of one of the doctors, because he went abroad 
several times) went to Australia for 57 days to take part in 
medical research in connection with infertility and an inability 
to get pregnant, whereas the head of the medical delegation and 
another person were in the United States during this time. These 
individuals have had no employment relationship with the Voice 
and Vision and are merely physicians under contract with the 
organization and are not involved in the organization for the 
development and progress of medical science to go on such 
assignments abroad. 
  As a rule, in the Voice and Vision, there are many 
assignments abroad for particular individuals, which are not 
very much related to the duties and the mission of the 
organization and take place under various pretexts. Apparently, 
even as New Year bonuses and rewards, individuals are sent on 
assignment abroad. For example, let us consider the case of Mr. 
M D., the administrative and financial director. According to 
four documents from 1366 to 1368, he has traveled to England, 
Germany, and so on, receiving $4,355. 
  And at the end of the audit, that is, at the new year 1371 
[21 March 1992], also he was on assignment abroad. There are 
only a small number of his assignments abroad that were seen in 
a brief examination of the records. Usually he goes on 
assignment abroad several times a year to inspect the offices of 
the organization. 
  A contract employee had requested from the management of the 
organization that due to a problem with his hand that he be 
assigned for 25 days to Sweden and England and while being 
treated, carry out the necessary studies to purchase 
premanufactured parts in those countries (document No. 4910, 
dated 16/05/1363 [7 August 1984]. Also, according to document 
No. 7676, dated 21/07/1363 [13 October 1984], he also had an 
assignment in Germany for about 20 days. From examining the 
documents, it is clear that on these assignments the main issue 
was medical examination and treatment and spending several 
thousand dollars for treatment, with the work of the 
organization being secondary. 
  In 1368, an eight-member group was given an assignment 
abroad 
for 53 days to purchase films (document No. 3455). The cost of 
their tickets was Rls3,157,600 and extra pay for their 
assignment $38,720. Some of the members of the group were not 
officials of films and related affairs, including the director 
of general affairs and programs affairs (who worked earlier in 
the auditing unit) and due to his position sometimes received 
large funds as bonuses in connection with serials. 
  In some cases, the routes of going and returning were quite 
different and the reason has been mainly to visit relatives in 
foreign countries. 
  In any case, in the continuation of the auxiliary prepayment 
account of the employees, it must be said: 
  The organization signed a contract with an individual to 
design and carry out the mechanized informational system from 
15/05/1365 [6 August 1986] for three months for Rls2,800,000, 
which was paid to him in three installments. Considering that 
his work was approved by the representative of the organization, 
nevertheless, the amount of the agreement remains in his debit 
account. Also, he had no employment relationship with the 
organization. Nevertheless, according to documents Nos. 1755, 
2648, and 2868 of 1365; Nos. 6768 and 4033 of 1366; No. 8163 of 
1367; and No. 2189 of 1368, he had gone on assignment abroad. 
Also, according to document No. 4654 of 1368, he went to Geneva 
to receive a British visa and returned after 15 days with no 
results. 
  The remainder of the prepayments of another person at the 
end 
of 1367, the amount of Rls3,061,400, was determined in the 
examinations of the committee that in 1367 he received Rls3 
million as partial payment for treatment, which he has not yet 
deposited. Nevertheless, document No. 5493 was requested from 
the document files, which was not found, according to the file 
clerk, while the committee was there. 
  The remainder of the prepayment of another at the end of 
1369 
is Rls2,064,555. In the examination of the books of the past 
years it becomes clear that this balance has been recorded in 
the books from 1362 (and certainly before it, since it was not 
possible to pursue it further). 
  Two other persons, a man and a woman, have a 
prepayment-balance total of Rls3,226,000, which was transferred 
to the books from 1361. 
  The balance of the prepayment of a man, Rls1,020,426, was 
transferred in books from 1361 and it was not possible to 
investigate it any further. But, apparently, in 1356 he caused 
the unintentional murder of a person and to pay compensation, he 
was given a loan of Rls1,000,000 by the organization, which has 
not been deducted from his salary in installments so far and no 
steps have been taken to settle and deposit it. 
  The balance of the prepayment of six others is 
Rls11,886,000. 
<H5>  Miscellaneous Prepayments Under the Main Code of 124 </H5>
  The above-mentioned auxiliary account includes 1,490 items, 
of which 220 are credit balances and 1,225 debit balances. As 
was pointed out earlier, in the above credit account, 
Rls8,998,232 are the result of errors in accounting operations 
and weaknesses in the financial and supervisory system of the 
organization and such accounts must at least be corrected, 
because credit in property items cannot be justified, including: 
  Four persons with a credit balance of a total of Rls797,000. 
  And other cases [exist], of which 19 cases were in excess of 
Rls100,000 and are included in the detailed report. Fifty-six 
cases of the above-mentioned debit account balance are over 
Rls500,000, which have been chosen and examined as samples. The 
general conclusion was that most of these debts were transferred 
from earlier years and no steps were taken to settle and deposit 
them. An explanation must be made that in order to pursue this 
matter, we were obliged to check the books of the previous years 
(usually until 1361), which was not free of problems because of 
the accounts being computerized and codified and sometimes the 
change of the password or the change of the people's names in 
the books, such as one year the person was registered as 'Ali 
Fazel and the next year as Fazel 'Ali, or the name Hasan was 
written Hoseyn or Mohsen and being certain of the correctness of 
the account and the person in question. 
  The summary of the results are as follows: 
  Eight employees owe a total of Rls14,913,000. 
<H3>  Balance of the Organization's Deposit Account With Others 
(With the Main Code of 126) </H3>
  At the end of 1368, it is Rls156,822,133 and the balance of 
the above-mentioned account in the Tehran Accounting Unit is 
49,780,278. In this case, it must be said that some of the items 
were not deposits by nature and necessary steps must be taken to 
correct the account, including: 
  The amount of Rls820,000 in 1360 for release of purchased 
tapes to the West Tehran Customs was paid, which was transferred 
in books until the end of 1370. Have the tapes not been released 
yet? 
  The amount of Rls500,000 in 1363 for the life insurance of 
wage earners sent to the war was paid to the Iranian insurance 
company, which every year is transferred to the next year's 
books. Has the war not yet ended? 
  In 1366, for permission to broadcast the World Cup Soccer 
[Touranment], Rls13,222,391 was paid to "I.B.U.," some of which 
was returned in 1368. Hence, the amount that appears to be a 
deposit in that establishment was 4,501,315, which was 
transferred to 1370. After several years had passed since the 
broadcast of these soccer games, the auditor has had no time to 
correct that account and include it in the expenditures. And 
there are other similar cases. 
<H3>  Balance of the Account of Deposits of the Persons in the 
Organization (With the Main Code 213) </H3>
  At the end of 1368, the amount of Rls33,501,671 and the 
remainder of the above-mentioned account in the Tehran 
accounting unit was Rls12,884,941. In this case, it must be said 
that from companies that give service to the Voice and Vision, 
such as Behpurkam Company and Atiyeh Company, instead of 10 
percent usually 5 percent is deducted to do their work well. Or 
in 1364, for participation in the bidding for release of goods, 
Rls1,600,000 were collected from various companies, which has 
remained in the accounts in that form and no necessary steps 
were taken. 
  In an examination of the discrepancy current account 90024 
of 
Melli, Afriqa Branch, in the name of the Tehran accounting unit, 
it can be seen: 
  Check No. 038906 in the amount of Rls60 million in 1366, 
according to document No. 6172, made to the Physical Education 
organization for purchasing a piece of land for athletics has 
been recorded in the books, which reappears as an item at the 
end of 1368. After following up the matter, it became clear that 
because no transaction has taken place, the Physical Education 
organization has not received the check at all, and it is at the 
disposal of the legal office of the Voice and Vision. Hence, to 
eliminate the above-mentioned discrepancy and return from the 
debtor account of the Physical Education organization, rapid 
steps must be taken. 
  Checks have been issued to various individuals as wages, 
etc., in the previous years, which as open items show 
discrepancies in the list and most probably were not given to 
the individuals, because the auditing office mistakenly records 
the documents before the checks are given out. In any case, 
considering that the checks are only valid for a maximum of six 
months from the date of issue, the usual steps must be taken to 
eliminate the open items of 1365 to 1366. 
  Some individuals who have had no official and employment 
relationship with the organization have received loans and after 
leaving service, the guarantors were asked for the installments, 
but the guarantors have in some cases said that they should not 
pay compensation for the person they have guaranteed for 
humanitarian and other reasons, and hence the management of the 
organization has excused such loans and included them in 
gratuitous aid (as an example, document No. 5416 in 1368). 
  In some cases, the deficit of the funds of individuals has 
been included in the expenditures account of the organization. 
Considering that these individuals are paid guarantees and also 
extra funds every month, any sort of deficit must be included in 
the accounts of the individuals and not the organization. 
(Examples are documents Nos. 2044 and 2902 in 1368.) 
<H5>  Program Affairs Unite (Code 21) </H5>
  The balance of the prepayment program account of the 
organization at the end of 1368 was Rls1,425,743,811, which is 
related to the Tehran Program Affairs Unit (including 391 
auxiliary accounts). 
  This sort of prepayment is deposited mostly in the personal 
account of the financial supervisor (or producer) for payment of 
some of the costs of production of the programs, and because the 
financial supervisor is an employee of the Voice and Vision, no 
guarantee is taken for it. Sometimes at the end of the year, 
they are not settled and are transferred to the prepayment 
accounts of the employees. If the contract is for making and 
delivery, all or some of the expenditures are accepted by the 
producer, and in this case, based on the contract, the 
installments are paid in proportion to the volume of work done. 
  The main problems of the above-mentioned account is not 
settling the payments after the serial of a program is 
completed. By examining 82 above-mentioned auxiliary accounts, 
which compose nearly 94 percent of the total balances, it can be 
seen that despite the production and broadcast of programs and 
serials from the Voice and Vision, still various individuals are 
in debt due to those serials and programs, and no settlement of 
the account has taken place. For example, one of the producers 
of the serial, "Hezardastan," which was produced several years 
ago and broadcast on television, still owes Rls358,875,891 and 
Rls271,974,014. Another, for building the township for "The 
Silk Road" (preparing sets for Old Tehran to be used in the 
"Hezardastan" serial and other serials), owes Rls105,505,352, 
which has been transferred to 1369 without any steps being taken. 
  A person may owe for several programs. For example, a 
producer for producing "Haji Washington" movie (which was 
determined unsuitable for broadcast, and this is itself a 
problem) owes Rls15,571,414. 
  For the serials of "Mirza Kuchek Khan," "The Wolves," etc., 
which have been broadcast over television, still some 
individuals owe millions about the settlement of which no action 
has taken place by the auditor and the management of the 
organization. 
  Mr. A.N. (producer of the serial "War and Life") and Mr. 
A.S. 
(his financial supervisor) owe Rls104,500,000 and Rls1,000,000 
for prepayment of a program. The above-mentioned serial 
according to the estimates should have been completed by the end 
of 1367 [20 March 1989], but apparently, due to the financial 
inability of the producer, the above-mentioned serial was left 
incomplete. 
  The deposit received from a person for a serial called 
"'Aqiq" was Rls2,700,000, and the collected guarantee documents, 
Rls3,000,000, whereas his debt for this amounts to 
Rls43,100,000. 
  The remainder of the account of miscellaneous debts of the 
programs affairs at the end of 1368 was 45,007,955, which is 
related to 20 actual and legal persons. For example, according 
to a contract in 1367, the amount of Rls4,076,700 was paid to 
the Iranian Statistical Center to prepare and devise the map of 
the city of Tehran. The contract should have been completed in 
the second half of the same year, concerning the settlement of 
which no step has been taken. 
  The remainder of the temporary accounts of creditors in the 
programs affairs at the end of 1368 was 277,557,453. Some of the 
auxiliaries of the above-mentioned accounts have been 
transferred from previous years until 1370 without any steps 
being taken to settle the account. For example, Rls266,000 owed 
to Mr. M.Y. has been transferred from prior to 1363 to 1370 in 
the books. The documents and books prior to 1363 are not 
available in the filing office of the above-mentioned unit. 
Hence, it seems that some of the cases in the above-mentioned 
account are fraudulent. For example, individuals and 
distinguished persons have had scholarly and religious speech 
programs in the Voice and Vision without asking for fees. The 
organization has included some amounts in their credit account 
and hence such accounts have had to be transferred to the 
subsequent years. Some of the credits, too, are for including 
bonuses, fees, etc., in the accounts of individuals in which 
cases, too, many of the accounts have been transferred to the 
following years and the reasons are not clarified. Some cases 
are also due to correcting the accounts. For example, the 
remainder of the creditor of the prepayment account of the 
employees has been transferred to the above-mentioned account 
and corrected or the deposit of the debt of individuals, instead 
of being included in their prepayment credit, have been 
mistakenly recorded in the credit of the above-mentioned 
account, and hence the remainder of the prepayment, debit and 
credit accounts must be compared and adjusted in order to 
determine the cases and eliminate them and in this way reduce 
the futile volume of the above-mentioned accounts. 
  Actual debts of the organization (or credit of others) are 
only in cases when the organization has received funds for the 
making of films or offering other services, and it is not clear 
whether or not it has acted on its obligations or the 
above-mentioned accounts have not been corrected. For example, 
credit to the Oil Company, the Forestry and Pastures 
Organization, the University Jihad, etc., for the amounts of 
Rls4,770,000, Rls3,500,000, and Rls3,125,568, etc., for making 
films, printing, and copying of slides. 
<H5>  Program Expenditures Account </H5>
  In the Voice and Vision organization, the expenditures 
accounts are [numbered] from 501 to 599, which are closed as a 
temporary account at the end of the year in terms of profit and 
loss. The above-mentioned expenditures at the end of 1368 were: 
  Cost of materials, Rls329,234,803. 
  Cost of salaries, benefits, and wages, Rls18,791,325,023. 
  Other expenditures, Rls11,757,299,877. 
  The total is 30,874,859,703 [as published]. 
  But a series of expenditures have the special codes 601 to 
699, of programs which are being made that are regarded as 
permanent accounts and included in the balance sheet. In other 
words, the expenditures for the making of every program are 
transferred from year to year and in the year that the 
production of the program is completed, the total expenditures 
of the program are transferred to the expenditures account with 
code 600 and closed with the idea that the expenditures of the 
programs that in the course of production are considered a sort 
of property and in the year of completion and broadcast of the 
program are turned from being property to expenditures. This 
method of accounting is not desirable, because expenditures are 
in any case expenditures and the production of a part of a 
program is not considered property because it cannot compensate 
for the expenditures that have been done. With this method, the 
fiscal period of accounting from one year is changed into 
various years of production of every program, which is contrary 
to the accepted accounting principles and standards. Hence, the 
profit and loss of every year is not calculated realistically. 
Therefore, if in one year there are several costly serials under 
production but have not been completed and accounts are not 
settled, these expenditures are not reflected in the profit and 
loss list. If the goal of determining and calculating is the 
cost of the making of every program, the special file of every 
program can be recorded as the expenditures made for every year. 
  The above-mentioned expenditures at the end of 1368 are: 
  Cost of materials for the programs under production, 
Rls228,720,924. 
  The cost of salaries, benefits, and wages during the 
production, Rls143,495,762. 
  Other costs in the course of production, Rls3,111,688,466. 
  A total of Rls3,483,905,192. [as published]. 
  In examining the expenditure accounts of code 600, it can be 
seen that the production cost of serials that were produced and 
broadcast prior to 1368 have not yet been transferred to the 
final expenditure account, code 500, including: 
  Expenditures of code 600 for the "Hezardastan" serial, 
Rls2,648,590. 
  Expenditures of code 600 for the serial "Mirza Kuchek Khan," 
Rls672,459,000. Expenditures of code 600 of the serial "The 
Wolves," Rls132,374,735. 
  Expenditures of code 600 of the serial "The Neighbor's 
Shadow," Rls65,861,026. 
  The important issue in this case is that the programs were 
not produced during the projected periods. Because of these 
delays, the organization has been burdened with great costs for 
maintenance of the resources during the halt in production and 
also due to inflation. For example, in examining the file of the 
serial, "Mirza Kuchek Khan," it can be seen that the initial 
estimate in 1363 was Rls436,202,600 and due to lack of proper 
planning, the estimates are regularly corrected and the 
financial burden of the organization increases. For example, the 
expenditures for the period of shut down and halt in the filming 
of the serial from 29/01/64 [18 April 1985] for four months was 
Rls48,500,000 and in Amendment 5, the total estimate was 
ratified for Rls709,442,940, that is, it has had more than 
92-percent cost increase compared to the initial estimate. 
  Essentially, amending estimates has been done after the 
expenditures were made and the date of most heavy projects both 
because of financial expenditures or the method and time of 
production is always coupled with dissatisfaction and disorder. 
The director, producer, and manager of the project (the 
implementor of the project) are usually changed in large 
projects. The initial director of the serial "Mirza Kuchek Khan" 
was Naser Taqva'i. In the second phase of filming Behruz Afkhami 
was introduced as the director. Or the manager of the project 
was changed during the production of this serial, and such 
actions increase the cost of production. 
  Initial estimates of the serial of "Ra'na" on 18/10/1367 [8 
January 1989] within the framework of eight 60-minute segments 
at Rls80,641,968 and the amended estimate on 04/12/1369 [23 
February 1991] within the framework of seven 46-minute segments 
has been Rls119,066,724. In other words, despite a 33-percent 
decrease in the time of the serial, the cost has increased by 
nearly 50 percent compared to the initial estimate. 
  The important issue is that many of the serial segments 
after 
production were not considered suitable for broadcast. For 
example, the "Hezardastan" serial was produced in 23 segments, 
and although every segment was approved by the related 
management and has a receipt from the archives, after completion 
and due to changes in management, personal tastes, and lack of a 
clear policy, only 10 segments of it were considered suitable 
for broadcast. And the "Haji Washington" serial was not 
considered suitable for broadcast at all. 
  In examining the expenditure documents of the 
above-mentioned 
serials, it can be seen that: 
  Purchases are mostly without receipts and only are included 
in the account with the approval of the financial supervisor and 
the project management. 
  Invoices of the expenditures are mostly without the seal, 
signature, and an address. 
  Entertainment expenditures are large. The total 
entertainment 
expenditures for "Mirza Kuchek Khan" were about Rls73 million. 
  Despite the very good transportation equipment of the Voice 
and Vision, mostly private agencies are used to transport actors. 
  For every serial, large bonuses, even to individuals who 
were 
not connected with the serial, are given. The total bonuses paid 
for the "Mirza Kuchek Khan" serial were more than Rls10 million. 
<H5>  Central Accounting Unit (Code 11) </H5>
  The above-mentioned unit combines the financial operations 
of 
the Tehran units and centers and in fact is the financial 
representative of the organization with the government and the 
Treasury. Preparing the budget, receiving funds from the 
Treasury, and distributing them among the units and centers and 
ultimately organizing the financial lists of the organization 
are the duties of this unit. 
  The miscellaneous debit account, which is one of the main 
accounts of this unit, which at the end of 1368 had a balance of 
Rls6,961,103,521, was paid to them after the guarantee funds, 
but the deposit procedures were not made clear to this 
committee. It needs to be explained that in the Voice and 
Vision, an employee can receive loans from various sources and 
for various reasons: From the future security and retirement 
fund of the organization, based on 8 percent of the base salary 
of the employee share and 16 percent of the organization share, 
the housing savings fund (5 percent of the monthly salary of the 
employees share and 10 percent organization share), cooperative 
savings fund (2 percent of the base salary of employees share, 
and 16 percent of the organization share), and other aid by the 
organization to the above-mentioned funds from a percentage of 
the revenues from advertisement, etc., and ultimately from the 
current budget of the organization. 
<H5>  Salary and Wages Accounting Unit (Code 13) </H5>
  To briefly examine the above-mentioned unit, the committee 
tried to examine the banking accounts, but usually faced the 
absence of the director of the unit (Mr. H., who because he has 
a private company and other work and also due to lack of control 
of the entry and exit of employees in the building on the Africa 
Expressway for which reason the employees often delayed the 
transfer of this division to the main building on Jam-e Jam 
Street, most of their time, especially that of the managers, is 
spent outside the work environment) and lack of cooperation of 
his deputy (Mr. F.P.), a retired person who has been called back 
to work. In any case, as an example, Document No. 344, dated 
30/03/1368 [20 June 1989] in connection with the fees for the 
services of managers was requested, which later only with the 
permission of the head of the unit was placed at the disposal of 
the committee. The amount of Rls4,421,257 in accordance with 
Document No. 1633, dated 21/04/1368 [12 July 1989], of the 
Tehran accounting unit (which is the expenditure unit) has been 
included in the annual profit and loss account. The 
above-mentioned document is one of the fees for service payments 
of 38 persons (mostly managers of the organization) who have 
worked on a project called the Committee for Designing the Work 
Force Model in Esfand 1367 [20 February-20 March 1989] to 
Farvardin 1368 [21 March-20 April 1989]. 
  First, only the share of fees for services in Esfand 1367 
can 
be included in the annual profit-and-loss account and the share 
of Farvardin must be included in the current expenditures of the 
organization. 
  With a brief examination of the checkbook for 1370 of 
Banking 
Account 90042 of the unit and the wages, large figures are seen 
as overtime pay and bonuses to some individuals at about 30,000 
to 80,000 tomans. In connection with 1368, document No. 7012 
indicates this situation. Because the financial operations of 
the organization is unit by unit, some individuals apparently 
receive overtime pay or bonuses in every unit. For example, at 
the end of 1370, a man had received bonuses of 10,000 to 12,000 
tomans in five units. 
  Second, the basis of calculation of the work hours of 
individuals in the above-mentioned project is after 14 [2 pm ?] 
on, that is, two hours prior to the end of official time. 
  Third, the fees for services per hour are calculated on the 
basis of 10 percent of the monthly salary, for which there is no 
legal justification. 
  Fourth, the taxes are calculated at 5 percent, whereas they 
must be calculated on the basis of taxes on salaries and 
benefits. It is noteworthy that the above-mentioned project 
ultimately was presented as the master's degree thesis of one of 
the officials of the College of Administrative Sciences and 
Business Management. At present, he is living abroad. 
  As a rule, in the various units of the organization, 
particular persons carry out the delayed work of that 
organization under the heading of projects and in this way 
receive fees for services. For example, in the auditing office, 
the project for the mechanization of the financial system was 
headed by a retired person from the organization who every month 
received large amounts for his services as the head of the 
project (other people are also involved in this project). This 
project started three years ago. Or the project for delayed 
accounts of the Salaries and Wages Unit and certainly other 
projects, which have not been examined can be found (which is a 
part of the Salary and Wages Accounting Unit). It can be seen 
that so far a discrepancy banking list has not been prepared for 
the above-mentioned account to the point that according to the 
balance on 30/09/1370 [21 December 1991] of this accounting 
office, the above-mentioned bank shows a credit balance of 
Rls735,674,634, whereas the bank balance must always be a debit. 
In a brief examination of the above-mentioned banking account, 
it can be seen that in 1368, according to document No. 2760, 
dated 30/10/1368 [20 January 1990], three 500-million-rial items 
(a total of Rls150 million [as published]) has been deposited to 
this account from the retirement fund, and according to document 
No. 2278, dated 30/09/1368 [21 December 1989], on the 
instruction of the auditor, three 500-million-rial savings 
accounts have been transferred to the Melli Bank's, Africa 
Branch. Considering that the deposit document has been recorded 
in the books a month after the payment document, this situation 
itself shows the weakness and inability of the above-mentioned 
accounting office. Deposit and payment of the above-mentioned 
funds are evident in the card [as published] of the related 
bank. According to document No. 2790, dated 30/10/1368, one of 
the deposits has been withdrawn, of which Rls200 million has 
been deposited in the retirement fund and Rls300 million in 
account No. 90032. The withdrawal from the above-mentioned 
savings account was with the signature of the head of the 
retirement fund and the head of the Salaries and Wages Unit. But 
in this case, according to the statements of the head of the 
retirement fund, the director of the bank, due to his 
acquaintance with the head of the Salaries and Wages Unit and 
without informing him, has withdrawn the above-mentioned 
deposits. (Due to lack of precise accounting in the accounting 
office of the retirement fund, the documented record of the 
withdrawal and the other two deposits were not found.) 
Ultimately, another Rls200 million was deposited in the 
retirement fund account and Rls1,200 million to the auditing 
account, while the fate of the other Rls100 million is unclear. 
According to information, the above-mentioned amount is at the 
disposal of the manager of the companies under the control of 
the organization, but it is not recorded anywhere. The head of 
the employees retirement fund expressed lack of knowledge in 
this connection and said that he was against it from the 
beginning. The head of the retirement fund was asked, for what 
reason were these funds used to open the savings account and for 
that matter not directly but through the savings funds bank. He 
says that it was the order of the auditor. 
  On the other hand, it was decided that the head of the 
retirement fund should present the latest balance and documents 
that show the above-mentioned operations. Later, when members of 
the committee went to see him, they could not because he was in 
meetings or absent. The head of the accounting office of the 
Fund also due to the emphatic instruction of the head of the 
funds not to present any information to the committee has 
excused himself and has only said that no books are kept in this 
connection, and meanwhile by transferring this division to the 
glass building on Jam-e Jam and moving the documents, the work 
was left incomplete. 
<H5>  Result of the Report and Opinion of the Auditing Committee </H5>
  Lack of an organized accounting system suitable to the goals 
and activities of the organization, imposing various tastes in 
regards to the units and centers and lack of an experienced and 
expert cadre has caused the methods used not to respond to the 
needs of the organization and also not to guarantee offering the 
necessary information in regards to the activities of the 
organization. 
  By combining the trial balance sheets of the units and 
centers, in fact, all the activities of the Voice and Vision 
will be unified and the financial operations will be centralized 
in one accounting system. Nevertheless, this combination will be 
only in the financial lists and not in the details of activities 
and operations (auxiliary accounts). 
  The design system of the structure of the Voice and Vision 
is 
the so-called divisionalized form [preceding text in English], 
which due to complexity and extreme decentralization causes 
problems for auditing. Hence, in such structural systems, 
outside control can hardly work and the operations of the 
organization must be supervised by strengthening internal 
controls as much as possible. This is very weak in the Voice and 
Vision. 
  In connection with the production of programs, no control 
system exists to be relied upon in auditing. Moreover, no 
satisfactory method exists for the auditors to be able to prove 
the completeness of the financial records of the program. For 
this reason, the auditors have not been able to obtain all the 
information and explanations that they considered necessary and 
subsequently being sure of the accounting and financial history 
and its accuracy in regards to most accounts as well as being 
certain concerning whether or not the views of the legislature 
have been observed in the activities of the Voice and Vision was 
not possible. 
<H3>  Brief Statements of the Speaker of the Majles After the 
Reading of the Inquiry and Investigation </H3>
  We hope in future inquiries and investigations that the 
gentlemen take into consideration the situation of the Majles, 
those who will listen to it, and the agenda of the Majles and be 
able to prepare the report in a more concise and summarized form 
in order for us to be able to attend to our other work and for 
the program of supervision or inquiry and investigation to 
preserve its credibility. 
  Regarding the fact that the gentlemen (deputies) will decide 
what will happen to the results of the inquiry and 
investigation, I must say, we will act in accordance with the 
bylaws. Inquiry and investigation is based on the bylaws. The 
inquiry and investigation is read and announced from the podium 
of the Majles. Up to this point, it is the duty of the Majles. 
  The second item on the agenda of the open session of the 
Majles yesterday was a report by the Planning and Budget 
Committee concerning the urgent bill to amend Note 3 of the 1372 
national budget law, of which the single article was ratified. 

